Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-43] Rentals. (a)
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the authority shall fix the
rates of the rentals for dwelling units and other facilities in state
low-income housing projects provided for by this subpart, at rates that will
produce revenues that will be sufficient to pay all expenses of management,
operation, and maintenance, including the cost of insurance, a proportionate
share of the administrative expenses of the authority to be fixed by it, and
the costs of repairs, equipment, and improvements, to the end that the state
low-income housing projects shall be and always remain self-supporting. The
authority, in its discretion, may fix the rates in amounts as will produce
additional revenues (in addition to the foregoing) sufficient to amortize the
cost of the state low-income housing project or projects, including equipment,
over a period or periods of time that the authority may deem advisable.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, if:

(1) Any state low-income housing project or projects
have been specified in any resolution of issuance adopted pursuant to
part I;

(2) The income or revenues from any project or
projects have been pledged by the authority to the payment of any bonds issued
under part I; or

(3) Any of the property of any state low-income
housing project or projects is security for the bonds,

the authority shall fix the rates of the rentals for
dwelling units and other facilities in the state low-income housing project or
projects so specified or encumbered at increased rates that will produce the
revenues required by subsection (a) and, in addition, those amounts that may be
required by part I, by any resolution of issuance adopted under part I, and by
any bonds or mortgage or other security issued or given under part I. [L 2006,
c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next